Hawaii statutes.
§587A-13 Summons
and service of summons. (a) After a
petition has been filed, the court shall issue a summons requiring the presence
of the parents and other persons to be parties to the proceeding except
the child, as follows:

(1) A copy of the petition shall be attached to each
summons;

(2) The summons shall notify the parties of their
right to retain and be represented by counsel; and

(3) The summons shall state: "YOUR PARENTAL AND
CUSTODIAL DUTIES AND RIGHTS CONCERNING THE CHILD OR CHILDREN WHO ARE
THE SUBJECT OF THE ATTACHED PETITION MAY BE TERMINATED IF YOU FAIL TO APPEAR ON
THE DATE SET FORTH IN THIS SUMMONS."

(b) The court may issue a summons to a parent
or any person having physical custody of the child to bring the child before
the court at the temporary foster custody hearing or the return hearing.

(c) The sheriff or other authorized person
shall serve the summons by personally delivering a certified copy to the person
or legal entity being summoned. A return on the summons shall be filed,
showing the date and time and to whom service was made; provided that:

(1) If the party to be served does not reside in the
State, service shall be made by registered or certified mail addressed to the
party's last known address; or

(2) If the court finds that it is impracticable to
personally serve the summons, the court may order service by registered or
certified mail addressed to the party's last known address, or by publication,
or both. When publication is used, the summons shall be published once a week
for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county
in which the party was last known to have resided. In the order for
publication of the summons, the court shall designate the publishing newspaper
and shall set the date of the last publication at no less than twenty-one days
before the return date. Such publication shall have the same force and effect
as personal service of the summons.

(d) The petitioner shall notify the child of a
hearing under this section no less than twenty-four hours prior to the time set
for a temporary foster custody hearing, or no less than forty-eight hours prior
to the time set for any other hearing.

(e) Service shall be completed no less than
twenty-four hours prior to the time set forth in the summons for a temporary
foster custody hearing, or no less than forty-eight hours prior to the time set
forth in the summons for any other hearing, unless the party was present when
ordered by the court to appear at the hearing.

(f) The court
may issue a warrant for the appearance of a person or child, as well as issue
an order pursuant to section 587A-16(b), if:

(1) The summons cannot be personally served;

(2) The person served fails to obey the summons;

(3) The court finds that service will not be
effective; or

(4) The court finds that the best interests of the
child require that the child be brought into the custody of the court. [L 2010,
c 135, pt of §1; am L 2014, c 36, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next